Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-283
Dispositional hearing; rules of evidence.

Strict rules of evidence shall not be applied at any dispositional hearing.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 39.

This section is applicable at a hearing to determine who shall have custody of a juvenile pending an adjudication; thus, relaxed rules of evidence may be followed. In re Interest of R.G., 238 Neb. 405, 470 N.W.2d 780 (1991).

Although strict rules of evidence do not apply at a dispositional hearing, a proceeding to terminate parental rights must employ fundamentally fair procedures satisfying the requirements of due process. In re Interest of Tabitha J., 5 Neb. App. 609, 561 N.W.2d 252 (1997).